Utah statutes.
13-25a-108.   Objections to telephone solicitations.

A person may not make or cause to be made an unsolicited telephone call within Utah to a telephone number contained in the no-call database established under Section 13-25a-109.



Amended by Chapter 263, 2004 General Session

